Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 16.
JURY TRIAL (CONST., ART. 2, § 7, AMENDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment amended Ark. Const., Art. 2, § 7, and is incorporated therein. The amendment was proposed by the General Assembly at the 1927 regular session (see Acts 1927, p. 1190 and Acts 1929, p. 1521) and adopted at the general election on Nov. 6, 1928, by a vote of 101,890 for and 52,147 against.